Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. City Property Tax.

Administrative Code. —

For senior citizen and disabled veteran property tax exemption, see 3 AAC 135.

For senior citizen property tax equivalency payment, see 3 AAC 136.

Sec. 29.45.550.
Cities outside boroughs.

Home rule and first class cities outside boroughs may assess, levy, and collect a property tax.
A property tax if levied must be assessed, levied, and collected as provided by AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.500

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section to home rule and general law municipalities, see AS

29.45.800

.

Sec. 29.45.560.
Cities inside boroughs.

Home rule and first class cities inside boroughs may levy a property tax.
A property tax, if levied, is subject to AS

29.45.010

—

29.45.050

,

29.45.090

—

29.45.100

,

29.45.250

,

29.45.400

—

29.45.440

and

29.45.460

—

29.45.500

.
The council shall by June 15 of each year present to the assembly a statement of the city’s rate of levy unless a different date is agreed upon by the borough and city.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Cross references. —

For applicability of this section to home rule and general law municipalities, see AS

29.45.800

.

Collateral references. —

72 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, § 673 et seq.

Sec. 29.45.570.
[Renumbered as AS 29.45.800.]

Sec. 29.45.580.
Differential tax zones.

A city may by ordinance establish, alter, and abolish differential tax zones to provide and levy property taxes for services not provided generally in the city or a different level of service than that provided generally in the city.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although this section permits a city to levy a differential rate in tax zones “for services not provided generally in the city . . . ”, such an arrangement as to oil and gas property appears to violate the uniformity provision of AS

43.56.010(b)

, which states that a tax on oil and gas property “shall be levied at a rate no higher than the rate applicable to other property taxable by the municipality.” December 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

In the event that creation of a tax zone consisting entirely of oil and gas property was proper and was thereby taxed at a higher mill rate than other property in the city under this section because it received different services than those generally provided in the city, the municipality’s collection of the higher tax from Alyeska in 1986 failed to meet the requirement of a rational relationship between the benefits conferred and the costs of the taxpayer in 1986. December 8, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 29.45.590.
Limited property taxing power for second class cities.

A second class city may by referendum levy property taxes as provided for first class cities. However, levy of an ad valorem tax by a second class city may not exceed two percent of the assessed value of the property taxed, except that the limit does not apply to a levy necessary to avoid a default upon payment of principal and interest of bonded or other indebtedness that is secured by a pledge to levy ad valorem or other taxes without limit to meet debt payments.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 123 SLA 1994; am § 8 ch 40 SLA 1995)

Sec. 29.45.600.
Combining property tax with incorporation of a second class city.

A petition for second class city incorporation may request that a property tax proposal be placed on the same ballot. The petition must state the proposed tax rate.
The petition may request that incorporation be dependent on the passage of the property tax proposition.
If so, the incorporation proposition fails if the property tax fails.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985)